Utah statutes.
64-13-42.   Prison Telephone Surcharge Account -- Funding inmate and offender education and training programs.

(1) (a)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Prison Telephone Surcharge Account.

(b)  The Prison Telephone Surcharge Account consists of:

(i)  beginning July 1, 2006, revenue generated by the state from pay telephone services located at any correctional facility as defined in Section 64-13-1;

(ii)  interest on account money;

(iii) (A)  money paid by inmates participating in postsecondary education provided by the department; and

(B)  money repaid by former inmates who have a written agreement with the department to pay for a specified portion of the tuition costs under the department's deferred tuition payment program;

(iv)  money collected by the Office of State Debt Collection for debt described in Subsection (1)(b)(iii); and

(v)  money appropriated by the Legislature.

(2)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, money from the Prison Telephone Surcharge Account shall be used by the department for education and training programs for offenders and inmates as defined in Section 64-13-1.

(3)  Funds appropriated from the Prison Telephone Surcharge Account may only be used by the department for purposes under Subsections 53A-1-403.5(3)(a)(i) and (iv).



Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

